Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 5 Mental Health Law
40.1-5-8.
Civil court certification.

Petitions. A verified petition may be filed in the district court, or family court in the case of a person who has not reached his or her eighteenth (18th) birthday, for the certification to a facility of any person who is alleged to be in need of care and treatment in a facility, and whose continued unsupervised presence in the community would create a likelihood of serious harm by reason of psychiatric disability. The petition may be filed by any person with whom the subject of the petition may reside; or at whose house the person may be; or the father or mother, husband or wife, brother or sister, or the adult child of the person; the nearest relative if none of the above are available; or the person’s guardian; or the attorney general; or a local director of public welfare; or the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals; the director of the department of human services; or the director of the department of corrections; the director of the department of health; the warden of the adult correctional institutions; the superintendent of the boys training school for youth, or his or her designated agent; or the director of any facility, or the facility director’s designated agent, whether or not the person shall have been admitted and is a patient at the time of the petition. A petition under this section shall be filed only after the petitioner has investigated what alternatives to certification are available and determined why the alternatives are not deemed suitable.

Contents of petition. The petition shall state that it is based upon a personal observation of the person concerned by the petitioner within a ten-day (10) period prior to filing. It shall include a description of the behavior that constitutes the basis for the petitioner’s judgment that the person concerned is in need of care and treatment and that a likelihood of serious harm by reason of psychiatric disability exists. In addition, the petitioner shall indicate what alternatives to certification are available; what alternatives have been investigated; and why the investigated alternatives are not deemed suitable.

Certificates and contents thereof. A petition hereunder shall be accompanied by the certificates of two (2) physicians unless the petitioner is unable to afford, or is otherwise unable to obtain, the services of a physician or physicians qualified to make the certifications. The certificates shall be rendered pursuant to the provisions of §

40.1-5-5

, except when the patient is a resident in a facility, the attending physician and one other physician from the facility may sign the certificates, and shall set forth that the prospective patient is in need of care and treatment in a facility and would likely benefit therefrom, and is one whose continued unsupervised presence in the community would create a likelihood of serious harm by reason of psychiatric disability together with the reasons therefor. The petitions and accompanying certificates shall be executed under penalty of perjury, but shall not require the signature of a notary public thereon.

Preliminary hearing.

Upon a determination that the petition sets forth facts constituting reasonable grounds to support certification, the court shall summon the person to appear before the court at a preliminary hearing, scheduled no later than five (5) business days from the date of filing. This hearing shall be treated as a priority on the court calendar and may be continued only for good cause shown. In default of an appearance, the court may issue a warrant directing a police officer to bring the person before the court.

At the preliminary hearing, the court shall serve a copy of the petition upon the person and advise the person of the nature of the proceedings and of the person’s right to counsel. If the person is unable to afford counsel, the court forthwith shall appoint the mental health advocate for him or her. If the court finds that there is no probable cause to support certification, the petition shall be dismissed, and the person shall be discharged unless the person applies for voluntary admission. However, if the court is satisfied by the testimony that there is probable cause to support certification, a final hearing shall be held not less than seven (7) days, nor more than twenty-one (21) days, after the preliminary hearing, unless continued at the request of counsel for the person, and notice of the date set down for the hearing shall be served on the person. Copies of the petition and notice of the date set down for the hearing shall also be served immediately upon the person’s nearest relatives or legal guardian, if known, and to any other person designated by the patient, in writing, to receive copies of notices. The preliminary hearing can be waived by a motion of the patient to the court if the patient is a resident of a facility.

Petition for examination.

Upon motion of either the petitioner or the person, or upon its own motion, the court may order that the person be examined by a psychiatrist appointed by the court. The examination may be conducted on an outpatient basis and the person shall have the right to the presence of counsel while it is being conducted. A report of the examination shall be furnished to the court, the petitioner, and the person and his or her counsel at least forty-eight (48) hours prior to the hearing.

If the petition is submitted without two (2) physicians’ certificates as required under subsection (c), the petition shall be accompanied by a motion for a psychiatric examination to be ordered by the court. The motion shall be heard on the date of the preliminary hearing set by the court pursuant to subsection (d), or as soon thereafter as counsel for the subject person is engaged, appointed, and ready to proceed. The motion shall be verified or accompanied by affidavits and shall set forth facts demonstrating the efforts made to secure examination and certification by a physician or physicians and shall indicate the reasons why the efforts failed.

After considering the motion and testimony as may be offered on the date of hearing the motion, the court may deny the application and dismiss the petition, or upon finding: (i) That there is a good cause for the failure to obtain one or more physician’s certificates in accordance with subsection (c); and (ii) That there is probable cause to substantiate the allegations of the petition, the court shall order an immediate examination by two (2) qualified psychiatrists, pursuant to subsection (e)(1).

Professional assistance. A person with respect to whom a court hearing has been ordered under this section shall have, and be informed of, a right to employ a mental health professional of the person’s choice to assist the person in connection with the hearing and to testify on the person’s behalf. If the person cannot afford to engage such a professional, the court shall, on application, allow a reasonable fee for the purpose.

Procedure. Upon receipt of the required certificates and/or psychiatric reports as applicable hereunder, the court shall schedule the petition for final hearing unless, upon review of the reports and certificates, the court concludes that the certificates and reports do not indicate, with supporting reasons, that the person who is the subject of the petition is in need of care and treatment; that his or her unsupervised presence in the community would create a likelihood of serious harm by reason of psychiatric disability; and that all alternatives to certification have been investigated and are unsuitable, in which event the court may dismiss the petition.

Venue. An application for certification under this section shall be made to, and all proceedings pursuant thereto shall be conducted in, the district court, or family court in the case of a person who has not yet reached his or her eighteenth (18th) birthday, of the division or county in which the subject of an application may reside or may be, or when the person is already a patient in a facility, in the district court or family court of the division or county in which the facility is located, subject, however, to application by any interested party for change of venue because of inconvenience of the parties or witnesses or the condition of the subject of the petition or other valid judicial reason for the change of venue.

Hearing. A hearing scheduled under this section shall be conducted pursuant to the following requirements:

All evidence shall be presented according to the usual rules of evidence that apply in civil, non-jury cases. The subject of the proceedings shall have the right to present evidence in his or her own behalf and to cross examine all witnesses against him or her, including any physician who has completed a certificate or filed a report as provided hereunder. The subject of the proceedings shall have the further right to subpoena witnesses and documents, the cost of such to be borne by the court where the court finds upon an application of the subject that the person cannot afford to pay for the cost of subpoenaing witnesses and documents.

A verbatim transcript or electronic recording shall be made of the hearing that shall be impounded and obtained or examined only with the consent of the subject thereof (or in the case of a person who has not yet attained his or her eighteenth (18th) birthday, the person’s parent, guardian, or next of kin) or by order of the court.

The hearing may be held at a location other than a court, including any facility where the subject may currently be a patient, where it appears to the court that holding the hearing at another location would be in the best interests of the subject thereof.

The burden of proceeding and the burden of proof in a hearing held pursuant to this section shall be upon the petitioner. The petitioner has the burden of demonstrating that the subject of the hearing is in need of care and treatment in a facility; is one whose continued unsupervised presence in the community would create a likelihood of serious harm by reason of psychiatric disability; and what alternatives to certification are available, what alternatives to certification were investigated, and why these alternatives were not deemed suitable.

The court shall render a decision within forty-eight (48) hours after the hearing is concluded.

Order. If the court at a final hearing finds by clear and convincing evidence that the subject of the hearing is in need of care and treatment in a facility, and is one whose continued unsupervised presence in the community would, by reason of psychiatric disability, create a likelihood of serious harm, and that all alternatives to certification have been investigated and deemed unsuitable, it shall issue an order committing the person to the custody of the director for care and treatment or to an appropriate facility. In either event, and to the extent practicable, the person shall be cared for in a facility that imposes the least restraint upon the liberty of the person consistent with affording the person the care and treatment necessary and appropriate to the person’s condition. No certification shall be made under this section unless and until full consideration has been given by the certifying court to the alternatives to in-patient care, including, but not limited to, a determination of the person’s relationship to the community and to the person’s family; of his or her employment possibilities; and of all available community resources, alternate available living arrangements, foster care, community residential facilities, nursing homes, and other convalescent facilities. A certificate ordered pursuant to this section shall be valid for a period of six (6) months from the date of the order. At the end of that period the patient shall be discharged, unless the patient is discharged prior to that time, in which case the certification shall expire on the date of the discharge.

Appeals.

A person certified under this section shall have a right to appeal from a final hearing to the supreme court of the state within thirty (30) days of the entry of an order of certification. The person shall have the right to be represented on appeal by counsel of his or her choice or by the mental health advocate if the supreme court finds that the person cannot afford to retain counsel. Upon a showing of indigency, the supreme court shall permit an appeal to proceed without payment of costs, and a copy of the transcript of the proceedings below shall be furnished to the subject of the proceedings, or to the person’s attorney, at the expense of the state. The certifying court shall advise the person of all the person’s rights pursuant to this section immediately upon the entry of an order of certification.

Appeals under this section shall be given precedence, insofar as practicable, on the supreme court dockets. The district and family courts shall promulgate rules with the approval of the supreme court to insure the expeditious transmission of the record and transcript in all appeals pursuant to this chapter.

Submission to NICS database.

The district court shall submit the name, date of birth, gender, race or ethnicity, and date of civil commitment to the National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS) database of all persons subject to a civil court certification order pursuant to this section within forty-eight (48) hours of certification.

Any person affected by the provisions of this section, after the lapse of a period of three (3) years from the date such civil certification is terminated, shall have the right to appear before the relief from disqualifiers board.

Upon notice of a successful appeal pursuant to subsection (k), the district court shall, as soon as practicable, cause the appellant’s record to be updated, corrected, modified, or removed from any database maintained and made available to the NICS and reflect that the appellant is no longer subject to a firearms prohibition as it relates to 18 U.S.C. § 922(d)(4) and 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(4).

Equitable authority. In addition to the powers heretofore exercised, the district and family courts are hereby empowered, in furtherance of their jurisdiction under this chapter, to grant petitions for instructions for the provision or withholding of treatment as justice and equity may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 140, § 19; P.L. 1976, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 242, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 423, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 455, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 7, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-5-9.
Right to treatment — Treatment plan.

Any person who is a patient in a facility pursuant to this chapter shall have a right to receive the care and treatment that is necessary for and appropriate to the condition for which he or she was admitted or certified and from which he or she can reasonably be expected to benefit. Each patient shall have an individualized treatment plan. This plan shall be developed by appropriate mental health professionals, including a psychiatrist, and implemented as soon as possible — in any event no later than five (5) days after a patient’s voluntary admission or involuntary court certification. Each individual treatment plan shall be made in accordance with the professional regulations of each facility, and by way of illustration and, not limited to the following, shall contain:

A statement of the nature of the specific problems and specific needs of the patient;

A statement of the least restrictive treatment conditions necessary to achieve the purposes of certification or admission;

A description of intermediate and long-range treatment goals; and

A statement and rationale for the plan of treatment for achieving these intermediate and long-range goals.

The individualized treatment plan shall become part of the patient’s record in accordance with §

40.1-5-5(g)

, and the subject of periodic review in accordance with §

40.1-5-10

. In implementing a treatment plan on behalf of any patient, the official in charge of any facility, or his or her designee(s), may, when it is warranted, authorize the release of the patient for such periods of time and under such terms and conditions that he or she deems appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-10.
Periodic institutional review proceedings.

In general. Each patient admitted or certified to a facility pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be the subject of a periodic review of his or her condition and status to be conducted by a review committee composed of at least one psychiatrist and other mental health professionals involved in treating the patient. The committee shall be composed of no fewer than three (3) persons and shall be appointed by the director of the facility or his or her designated agent. The reviews shall minimally involve an evaluation of the quality of care the patient is receiving, including an evaluation of the patient’s treatment plan, and the making of any recommendations for the improvement of the care or for the revision of the treatment plan, including alternative available living arrangements, foster care, community residential facilities, nursing homes, and other convalescent facilities. At every fourth review, one member of the committee shall be a member of the hospital’s utilization review committee appointed by that committee’s chairperson.

Frequency. The review proceedings shall take place at least once within each ninety-day (90) period during which a person is a patient in the facility.

Results of review. The results of each review shall be entered in the patient’s medical record, presented orally to the patient within twenty-four (24) hours, and confirmed by written notice to the patient and his or her guardian, or with the patient’s consent, to his or her next of kin, within seventy-two (72) hours. In the event the director of the facility is not a member of the committee, the notice shall be transmitted to him or her as well. Where the committee determines that further care in the facility is required, the notice to the patient shall include an explanation of the patient’s rights to pursue discharge as elsewhere provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 215, § 1.

40.1-5-11.
Discharge — Recertification.

The official in charge of any facility, or his or her designated agent, on having his or her reasons noted on the patient’s records, shall discharge any patient certified or admitted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, when:

Suitable alternatives to certification or admission are available;

The patient is, in the judgment of the official, recovered;

The patient is not recovered, but discharge, in the judgment of the official, will not create a likelihood of serious harm by reason of psychiatric disability.

When a patient discharge is requested and if the discharge is denied, the reasons therefor shall be stated, in writing, and noted in the patient’s record and a copy thereof shall be given to the person applying for the release.

At the expiration of the six-month (6) period set forth in §

40.1-5-8(j)

, or any subsequent six-month (6) period following recertification pursuant to this section, the patient shall be unconditionally released unless a recertification petition is filed by the official in charge of a facility, or his or her designated agent, within no less than fifteen (15) days and no more than thirty (30) days prior to the scheduled expiration date of a six-month (6) period. A hearing must be held pursuant to the petition and a decision rendered before the expiration of the six-month (6) period. A recertification hearing shall follow all of the procedures set forth in §

40.1-5-8

and recertification may be ordered only if the petitioner proves by clear and convincing evidence that the conduct and responses of the patient during the course of the previous six-month (6) period indicate that the patient is presently in need of care and treatment in a facility; is one whose continued unsupervised presence in the community would create a likelihood of serious harm by reason of psychiatric disability; and that all alternatives to recertification have been investigated and deemed unsuitable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-20-13; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40.1-5-13

; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 7, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-5-12.
Habeas corpus and other remedies.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as abrogating any rights of a person certified or someone acting on his or her behalf to petition for writ of habeas corpus and/or other relief. In addition, petitions may be specifically based upon, but not limited to, the following grounds:

An alleged insufficiency or illegality of the proceedings leading to the patient’s certification not previously litigated on appeal;

Although the certification proceedings were proper, the patient’s continued detention or hospitalization or the form of his or her hospitalization is not warranted under the provisions of this chapter;

The absence of a planned and adequate treatment program to meet the needs of the patient.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-13.
Mental health advocate.

There is hereby created the office of mental health advocate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-14.
Appointment and term of office of mental health advocate.

The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a member of the bar of this state who has been practicing law for at least five (5) years to fill the office of the mental health advocate. The appointment shall be made from a list of at least three (3) persons prepared and submitted by a committee consisting of one attorney appointed by the Rhode Island Disability Law Center; one person appointed by the Rhode Island Association for Mental Health; one person appointed by the Alliance for the Mentally Ill of Rhode Island; three (3) persons appointed by the Coalition of Consumer Self Advocates; one psychiatrist, appointed by the Rhode Island district branch of the American Psychiatric Association; one psychologist appointed by the Rhode Island Psychological Association; one social worker appointed by the Rhode Island chapter of the National Association of Social Workers; and two (2) members of the general public appointed by the governor. The person appointed mental health advocate shall hold office for a term of five (5) years and shall continue to hold office until his or her successor is appointed and qualified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 226, § 12; P.L. 1991, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 106; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 106.

40.1-5-15.
Staff of mental health advocate.

The mental health advocate may appoint assistants as may be deemed necessary whose powers and duties shall be similar to those imposed upon the mental health advocate by law and shall be performed under and by the advice and direction of the mental health advocate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-16.
Appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary for the payment of the salaries of such clerical assistance as may be deemed necessary and for the payment of office expenses and other actual expenses incurred by the mental health advocate in the performance of his or her duties; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sum or sums, or so much thereof, as may from time to time be required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the mental health advocate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-17.
Assistance of indigent persons.

If the mental health advocate, after examination and investigation of a financial statement of a person subject to the provisions of this chapter, is satisfied that the person submitting the financial statement is indigent, the mental health advocate or one of his or her assistants shall represent the person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-18.
Confidentiality of information received.

The mental health advocate, his or her assistants, and every employee of his or her office are hereby expressly prohibited from divulging to any individual not officially connected with his or her office any information obtained by the mental health advocate, his or her assistants, or any employee of that office in the regular course of their duty or from any financial statement submitted from the permanent records of that office, that would reveal any of the information relative to the financial status of any person submitting a financial statement; every request for information directed to the mental health advocate shall be denied if the request would necessitate that individual to divulge any information that is herein declared to be held confidential by the mental health advocate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-19.
False statements and representations.

Whoever knowingly makes a false statement or representation to the mental health advocate, his or her assistants, or any employee of his or her office to obtain the legal services of the mental health advocate or one of his or her assistants under this chapter, either for him or herself or for any other person, shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than three hundred dollars ($300), or by imprisonment not longer than thirty (30) days, or both a fine and imprisonment; and each false statement or representation shall constitute a separate and distinct offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-20.
Exemption from court fees or charges.

Any client represented by the mental health advocate, or his or her assistants, under the provisions of this chapter shall not be required to pay any fees to the district, superior, family, or supreme courts or the clerks thereof, or any fees or charges for the services or travel of deputy sheriffs for serving any writ, citation, subpoena, or other process or for making copies of the writs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 73.

40.1-5-21.
Annual report.

The mental health advocate shall annually submit to the governor, the director, and the general assembly a detailed report analyzing the work of his or her office and any recommendations resulting therefrom.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-22.
Duties of the mental health advocate.

The mental health advocate shall perform the following duties:

Ensure that each person in treatment and, in proper cases, others interested in the person’s welfare, is apprised of his or her rights under this chapter.

Review periodically the procedures established by facilities to carry out provisions of this chapter.

Assist any patient to obtain needed legal assistance concerning problems not related to the provisions of this chapter by referring the persons to appropriate lawyer referral services, public or private, depending upon the person’s ability to pay, and assist the persons in the preparation and transmission of correspondence, forms, and other communications.

Review complaints of persons and investigate those where it appears that a person may be in need of assistance from the mental health advocate.

Investigate and report to the director or person in charge of any facility, any occurrences, conditions, or practices with respect to procedure, personnel, or facilities that reflect inadequacies with reference to the provisions of this chapter.

Act as counsel for all indigent persons and to assist other than indigents to secure counsel relating to the application of the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, judicial proceedings hereunder.

Take all possible action including, but not limited to, programs of public education, legislative advocacy, and formal legal action, to secure and ensure the legal, civil, and special rights of persons who are subject to the provisions of this chapter.

Establish a formal liaison between the mental health advocate and community-based mental health clinics and other community facilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 226, § 12; P.L. 1982, ch. 414, § 14.

40.1-5-23.
Access to information.

The mental health advocate shall have access to the following information:

The names of all persons in treatment, and the date and place where treatment was begun, unless the patient specifically objects in writing. The patient shall be informed of his or her right to so object at the time of his or her admission.

All written protests and withdrawals of protests of involuntary treatment.

All current records required to be maintained under the provisions of this chapter, pertaining to individualized treatment plans and notices of denials of special rights, provided that the patient in treatment or guardian gives written permission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 215, § 1.

40.1-5-24.
Rights and powers of mental health advocate.

The mental health advocate shall have the following rights and powers:

To communicate privately by mail or orally with any person in treatment.

To inspect all records relating to persons in treatment provided that the person in treatment or his or her guardian gives written permission.

To take whatever steps are appropriate to see that persons are made aware of the services of the mental health advocate’s office, its purpose, and how it can be contacted. Officials in charge of each facility shall cooperate with the mental health advocate in this respect.

To take such actions that he or she deems appropriate to protect the rights of those criminally insane patients included within the forensic unit of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and those previously considered to be within the authority of the interstate compact on the mentally disordered offender.

To take necessary action to protect the rights of clients of community mental health centers.

To provide legal representation for indigent persons receiving inpatient treatment for substance abuse.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 341, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 185, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 470, § 1.

40.1-5-24.1.
Powers to accept grants and bequests.

The mental health advocate shall have the power to apply for and accept grants and bequests of funds from other states, governmental agencies, and independent authorities, and private firms, individuals, and foundations, with the approval of the director of administration. The funds shall be deposited with the general treasurer as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 123.

40.1-5-25.
Use of confidential information.

Personnel of the mental health advocate’s office shall be restricted in their use of confidential information by the applicable provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-26.
Disclosure of confidential information and records.

The fact of admission or certification, and all information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services to persons under this chapter, shall be confidential.

Information and records may be disclosed only:

To any person, with the written consent of the patient, or his or her guardian.

In communications among qualified medical or mental health professionals in the provision of services or appropriate referrals, or in the course of court proceedings. The consent of the patient, or his or her guardian, must be obtained before information or records may be disclosed by a professional person employed by a facility to a professional person not employed by the facility who does not have the medical responsibility for the patient’s care.

When the person receiving services, or his or her guardian, designates persons to whom information or records may be released, or if the person is a minor, when his or her parents or guardian make the designation.

To the extent necessary for a recipient to make a claim, or for a claim to be made on behalf of a recipient, for aid, insurance, or medical assistance to which he or she may be entitled.

To proper medical authorities for the purpose of providing emergency medical treatment where the person’s life or health are in immediate jeopardy.

For program evaluation and/or research, provided that the director adopts rules for the conduct of the evaluations and/or research. The rules shall include, but need not be limited to, the requirement that all evaluators and researchers must sign an oath of confidentiality, agreeing not to divulge, publish, or otherwise make known, to unauthorized persons or the public, any information obtained in the course of the evaluation or research regarding persons who have received services such that the person who received the services is identifiable.

To the courts, and persons designated by judges thereof, in accordance with applicable rules of procedure. The records and files maintained in any court proceeding pursuant to this chapter shall be confidential and available only to the person who was the subject of the proceeding, or his or her attorney.

To the state medical examiner in connection with the investigation of a fatality of a current or former patient to the extent necessary to assist the medical examiner in determining the cause of death.

To the director of health in accordance with, and to the extent authorized by, the provisions of chapter 37.3 of title 5 and all applicable federal laws and regulations; provided, however, that with respect to any information obtained, the department complies with all state and federal confidentiality laws, including, but not limited to, chapter 37.3 of title 5 and specifically §

5-37.3-4(c)

, and that the name, or names, of the patient, or patients, who is or are determined by the director of health to be immaterial to the request, inquiry, or investigation remain unidentifiable. Any treatment facility that provides information to the director of health in accord with a request under this subsection is not liable for wrongful disclosure arising out of any subsequent disclosure by the director of health.

To a probate court of competent jurisdiction, petitioner, respondent, and/or their attorneys, when the information is contained within a decision-making assessment tool that conforms to the provisions of §

33-15-47

.

To the department of children, youth and families and/or the department’s contracted designee for the purpose of facilitating effective care planning pursuant to §

42-72-5.2(2)

and in accordance with applicable state and federal laws, for a child hospitalized for psychiatric services and such services are paid for in whole or in part by the state, or for a child who may be discharged from an acute-care facility to an out-of-home mental or behavioral health agency for services and when such services will be paid for in whole or in part by the state.

To the RIte Care health plans for any child enrolled in RIte Care.

To the NICS database for firearms disqualifying information provided that only individual identifying information required by §

40.1-5-8(l)

is submitted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 351, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 352, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 314, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 400, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 423, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 455, § 2.

40.1-5-27.
Release of information to patient’s family.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the release of information to a patient’s attorney, his or her guardian or conservator, if any, or a member of the patient’s family the information that the person is presently a patient in the facility or that the person is seriously physically ill, if the official in charge of the facility or his or her designated agent determines that the release of the information is in the best interests of the person. Upon the death of a patient, his or her guardian or conservator, if any, and a member of his or her family shall be notified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 215, § 1.

40.1-5-27.1.
Disclosure by mental health professional.

Notwithstanding §§

40.1-5-26

and

40.1-5-27

, a mental health professional providing care and treatment to an adult person with a psychiatric disability as defined in §

40.1-5-2(12)

may provide certain information to a family member or other person if this family member or other person lives with and provides direct care to the psychiatrically disabled person, and without such direct care there would be significant deterioration in the psychiatrically disabled person’s daily functioning, and such disclosure would directly assist in the care of the psychiatrically disabled person. Disclosure can be made only at the written request of the family member or person living with the psychiatrically disabled person.

Prior to the disclosure, the psychiatrically disabled person shall be informed, in writing, of the request, the name of the person requesting the information, the reason for the request, and the specific information being provided. Prior to disclosure, the psychiatrically disabled person shall be provided the opportunity to give or withhold consent. If the psychiatrically disabled person withholds consent, the information shall not be disclosed and the family member or other person shall be provided the opportunity to appeal. Disclosures shall be limited to information regarding diagnosis, admission to or discharge from a treatment facility, the name of the medication prescribed, and side effects of prescribed medication.

On or before April 1, 1993, the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall promulgate rules and regulations to further define and interpret the provisions of this section. In the development of these rules and regulations, the department shall work with an advisory committee composed, at a minimum, of proportionate representation from the following: the Coalition of Consumer Self Advocates, the Alliance for the Mentally Ill, the Mental Health Association of Rhode Island, the Council of Community Mental Health Centers, the mental health advocate, and Rhode Island Protection and Advocacy Services. Rules and regulations by the department shall include the provision of an appeals process, that would serve to protect the rights of psychiatrically disabled persons under the law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 7, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-5-28.
Notice of disappearance of patient.

When disclosure is necessary for the protection of the patient or others due to his or her unauthorized disappearance from the facility, and his or her whereabouts is unknown, notice of the disappearance, along with relevant information, shall be made to relatives and governmental law enforcement agencies designated by the physician in charge of the patient or the professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her professional designee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.